Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1479.02
Major out-of-state contributor; report; contents; applicability; late filing fee.

(1) A major out-of-state contributor shall file with the commission an out-of-state contribution report. An out-of-state contribution report shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission within ten days after the end of the calendar month in which a person becomes a major out-of-state contributor. For the remainder of the calendar year, a major out-of-state contributor shall file an out-of-state contribution report with the commission within ten days after the end of each calendar month in which the contributor makes a contribution or expenditure.

(2) An out-of-state contribution report shall disclose as to each contribution or expenditure not previously reported (a) the amount, nature, value, and date of the contribution or expenditure, (b) the name and address of the committee, candidate, or person who received the contribution or expenditure, (c) the name and address of the person filing the report, and (d) the name, address, occupation, and employer of each person making a contribution of more than two hundred dollars in the calendar year to the person filing the report.

(3) This section shall not apply to (a) a person who files a report of a contribution or an expenditure pursuant to subsection (2) of section 49-1469, (b) a person required to file a report or campaign statement pursuant to section 49-1469.07, (c) a committee having a statement of organization on file with the commission, or (d) a person or committee registered with the Federal Election Commission.

(4) Any person who fails to file an out-of-state contribution report with the commission as required by this section shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of two hundred dollars for each of the first ten days the report remains not filed in violation of this section. After the tenth day, such person shall pay, for each day the report remains not filed, an additional late filing fee of one percent of the amount of the contributions or expenditures which were required to be reported, not to exceed ten percent of the amount of the contributions or expenditures which were required to be reported.

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 49-1469.04;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 29;

Laws 2007, LB434, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 60.
July 18, 2026